Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.060

Duties of officer—Standards—Liabilities.

(1) An officer of a social purpose corporation with discretionary authority shall discharge the officer's duties under that authority in good faith, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and in a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation in accordance with RCW 23B.08.420.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, in discharging his or her duties as an officer, the officer of a social purpose corporation may consider and give weight to one or more of the social purposes of the corporation as the officer deems relevant.

(3) Any action taken as an officer of a social purpose corporation, or any failure to take any action, that the officer reasonably believes is intended to promote one or more of the social purposes of the corporation shall be deemed to be in the best interests of the corporation.

(4) An officer of a social purpose corporation is not liable for any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of the officer's office in compliance with this section.

(5) Nothing in this chapter creates any liability or grants any right in or for any person or any cause of action by or for any person, and an officer shall not be responsible to any party other than the corporation and its shareholders.

(6) Nothing in this chapter alters the general standards for any officer of a corporation that is not a social purpose corporation.

[ 2012 c 215 s 7.]